Washington statutes.
RCW 5.52.040

Bills and notes drawn by telegraph—Effect.

Checks, due bills, promissory notes, bills of exchange and all orders or agreements for the payment or delivery of money, or other thing of value, may be made or drawn by telegraph, and when so made or drawn, shall have the same force and effect to charge the maker, drawer, indorser or acceptor thereof, and shall create the same rights and equities in favor of the payee, drawer [drawee], indorser [indorsee], acceptor, holder or bearer thereof, and shall be entitled to the same days of grace as if duly made or drawn and delivered in writing; but it shall not be lawful for any person other than the person or drawer thereof, to cause any such instrument to be sent by telegraph, so as to charge any person thereby, except as in RCW 5.52.050 otherwise provided. Whenever the genuineness or execution of any such instrument received by telegraph shall be denied on oath, by or on behalf of the person sought to be charged thereby, it shall be incumbent upon the party claiming under or alleging the same, to prove the existence and execution of the original writing from which the telegraph copy or duplicate was transmitted. The original message shall in all cases be preserved in the telegraph office from which the same is sent.

[Code 1881 s 2355; 1865 p 74 s 14; RRS s 11348.]